Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1542
Activities pass; authorized; when.

The board of governors of any community college area may authorize the issuance of a pass to any elected or appointed official, employee, retired employee, or volunteer of the community college area, member of a senior citizens group, or city official authorizing the admittance of the recipient of the pass and his or her spouse to recognized college activities without the need for the payment of any fee or charge. Such pass may be issued at no cost to the recipient or at such cost as may be designated by the board of governors.

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 13.